apertium-ca-it.it.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 7298
	Sdefs: 72
	Paradigms: 581

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="auxser" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="GD" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="ND" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="cometa">
    <e>
      <re>[’'‘]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="apos"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
      <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sent"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
      <re>,</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cm"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
      <re>[¿¡]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
      <re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
      <re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="salve__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="ij"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="asma__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="scacchi__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="agricolt/ore__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ori</l> 
        <r>ore<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ore</l> 
        <r>ore<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rici</l> 
        <r>ore<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rice</l> 
        <r>ore<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="infermier/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cosmetic/o__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>he</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abat/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ca/ne__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gne</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gna</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baron/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esse</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>essa</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="D/r__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>.ssa</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="marches/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aggre/ssore__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ssori</l> 
        <r>ssore<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ssore</l> 
        <r>ssore<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ditrice</l> 
        <r>ssore<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ditrici</l> 
        <r>ssore<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="marina/io__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>io<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>io</l> 
        <r>io<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="veterinar/io__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>io<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>io</l> 
        <r>io<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ie</l> 
        <r>io<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ia</l> 
        <r>io<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="Dr">
        <i>D</i> 
        <par n="D/r__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="aggressore">
        <i>aggre</i> 
        <par n="aggre/ssore__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="agricoltore">
        <i>agricolt</i> 
        <par n="agricolt/ore__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="anfibio">
        <i>anfib</i> 
        <par n="marina/io__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ardore">
        <i>ardor</i> 
        <par n="abat/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="arrivederci">
        <i>arrivederci</i> 
        <par n="salve__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="asma">
        <i>asma</i> 
        <par n="asma__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cacciatorpediniere">
        <i>cacciatorpedinier</i> 
        <par n="abat/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cameriere">
        <i>camerier</i> 
        <par n="infermier/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="campione">
        <i>campion</i> 
        <par n="baron/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cane">
        <i>can</i> 
        <par n="ca/ne__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="catalizzatore">
        <i>catalizzator</i> 
        <par n="abat/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="compositore">
        <i>composit</i> 
        <par n="agricolt/ore__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="compratore">
        <i>comprat</i> 
        <par n="agricolt/ore__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="conte">
        <i>cont</i> 
        <par n="baron/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="continente">
        <i>continent</i> 
        <par n="abat/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="contro">
        <i>contro</i> 
        <par n="scacchi__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cosmetico">
        <i>cosmetic</i> 
        <par n="cosmetic/o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dottore">
        <i>dottor</i> 
        <par n="baron/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="forte">
        <i>fort</i> 
        <par n="abat/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="giardiniere">
        <i>giardinier</i> 
        <par n="infermier/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="guardone">
        <i>guardon</i> 
        <par n="marches/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="infermiere">
        <i>infermier</i> 
        <par n="infermier/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="leone">
        <i>leon</i> 
        <par n="baron/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="marchese">
        <i>marches</i> 
        <par n="marches/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="marciapiede">
        <i>marciapied</i> 
        <par n="abat/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="marinaio">
        <i>marina</i> 
        <par n="marina/io__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="padrone">
        <i>padron</i> 
        <par n="infermier/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="panettiere">
        <i>panettier</i> 
        <par n="infermier/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pantalone">
        <i>pantalon</i> 
        <par n="abat/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pioniere">
        <i>pionier</i> 
        <par n="infermier/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="portiere">
        <i>portier</i> 
        <par n="infermier/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="presidente">
        <i>president</i> 
        <par n="baron/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="principe">
        <i>princip</i> 
        <par n="baron/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="professore">
        <i>professor</i> 
        <par n="baron/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="reattore">
        <i>reattor</i> 
        <par n="abat/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="romanziere">
        <i>romanzier</i> 
        <par n="infermier/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sacerdote">
        <i>sacerdot</i> 
        <par n="baron/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="signore">
        <i>signor</i> 
        <par n="marches/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="trattore">
        <i>trattor</i> 
        <par n="abat/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="veterinario">
        <i>veterinar</i> 
        <par n="veterinar/io__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="zuccheriere">
        <i>zuccherier</i> 
        <par n="infermier/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e>
        <par n="pardret" />
    </e>
    <e>
        <par n="numeros" />
    </e>
    <e>
        <par n="separ" />
    </e>
    <e>
        <par n="paresq" />
    </e>
    <e>
        <par n="coma" />
    </e>
    <e>
        <par n="separa" />
    </e>
    <e>
        <par n="cometa" />
    </e>
